Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-503]
Violation. A violation of this article shall be deemed an unfair method of
competition or unfair or deceptive trade act or practice in the business of
insurance in violation of section 431:13-102. [L 2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next